North Dakota, session 69, HB1334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
State vegetable.
Rhubarb, rheum rhabarbarum, is the official vegetable of the state of North Dakota.

H. B. NO. 1334 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1334.
House Vote: Yeas 81 Nays 11 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 24 Nays 22 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State